District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

47-4617

Sales tax exemption for sales to Close Up Foundation.

Expired.

History

Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-307, § 2(b), 56 DCR 25

Editor's Notes

Section (b) of this section as enacted by D.C. Law 17-307 stated that this section shall expire on December 31, 2012.